Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1372. Civil penalties.

The following civil penalties shall be assessed by the director:

If a determination is made finding that an employer willfully filed a false report, a monetary penalty equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a correct report or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is greater, shall be added to the liability of the employer for each quarter for which the employer willfully filed a false report. For the purposes of this section, a false report includes, but is not limited to, a report for a period wherein an employer pays remuneration for personal services which meets the definition of “wages” under section 72-1328, Idaho Code, and the payment is concealed, hidden, or otherwise not reported to the department.

If a determination is made finding that an employer willfully failed to file the employer’s quarterly unemployment insurance tax report when due, the director shall assess a monetary penalty equal to:

Seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a timely quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had not been found in any previous determination to have willfully failed to file a timely quarterly report for any of the sixteen (16) preceding consecutive calendar quarters; or

One hundred fifty dollars ($150) or fifty percent (50%) of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a timely quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had been found in any previous determination to have willfully failed to file a timely quarterly report for no more than one (1) of the sixteen (16) preceding consecutive calendar quarters; or

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or one hundred percent (100%) of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a timely quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had been found in any previous determination or determinations to have willfully failed to file a timely quarterly report for two (2) or more of the sixteen (16) preceding consecutive calendar quarters.

If a determination is made finding that an employer, or any officer or agent or employee of the employer with the employer’s knowledge, willfully made a false statement or representation or willfully failed to report a material fact when submitting facts to the department concerning a claimant’s separation from the employer, a penalty in an amount equal to ten (10) times the weekly benefit amount of such claimant shall be added to the liability of the employer.

If a determination is made finding that an employer has induced, solicited, coerced or colluded with an employee or former employee to file a false or fraudulent claim for benefits under this chapter, a penalty in an amount equal to ten (10) times the weekly benefit amount of such employee or former employee shall be added to the liability of the employer.

If a determination is made finding that an employer failed to complete and submit an Idaho business registration form when due, as required by section 72-1337(1), Idaho Code, a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be assessed against the employer.

For purposes of paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, the term “weekly benefit amount” means the amount determined by the director pursuant to section 72-1367(2), Idaho Code.

If a determination is made finding that a person has made any unauthorized disclosure of employment security information in violation of the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or section 72-1342, Idaho Code, or rules promulgated thereunder, a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for each act of unauthorized disclosure shall be assessed against the person.
(h) If a determination is made finding that a professional employer failed to submit a separate quarterly wage report for each client as required in section 72-1349B(4), Idaho Code, the director shall assess a monetary penalty equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each client not separately reported by the professional employer; provided that the maximum penalty for any quarter shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

At the discretion of the director, the department may waive all or any part of the penalties imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the employer shows to the satisfaction of the director that it had good cause for failing to comply with the requirements of this chapter and rules promulgated thereunder.

Determinations imposing civil penalties pursuant to this section shall be served in accordance with section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code. Penalties imposed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable twenty (20) days after the date the determination was served unless an appeal is filed in accordance with section 72-1368, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated thereunder. Such appeals shall be conducted in accordance with section 72-1368, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated thereunder.

Civil penalties imposed by this section shall be in addition to any other penalties authorized by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter that apply to the collection of contributions, and the rules promulgated thereunder, shall also apply to the collection of penalties imposed pursuant to this section. Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1373. Violation of this law or rules thereunder.

Any person who shall willfully violate any provision of this chapter or any order or rule thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which is required under the terms of this chapter, and for which a penalty is neither prescribed in this chapter, nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and each day such violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate misdemeanor.

§ 72-1374. Unauthorized disclosure of information.

If any of the following persons, in violation of the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or section 72-1342, Idaho Code, or rules promulgated thereunder, makes any unauthorized disclosure of employment security information, each act of unauthorized disclosure shall constitute a separate misdemeanor:

Any employee of the department;

Any employee or member of the commission;

Any third party or employee thereof who has obtained employment security information pertaining to a person with the written, informed consent of that person;

Any public official who has obtained employment security information for use in the performance of official duties; or

Any person who has obtained employment security information through means that violate the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or this chapter, or rules promulgated thereunder.

§ 72-1375. Protection of rights and benefits.

Any agreement to waive, release, or commute any right to benefits or other rights under this chapter shall be void. Any agreement by any individual performing services for a covered employer to pay all or any portion of any contributions or penalties required under this chapter from such employer, shall be void. No covered employer shall directly or indirectly make or require or accept any deduction from wages to finance the contributions required from him, require or accept any waiver of any right under this chapter by any individual rendering service for him, discriminate in regard to the hiring or tenure of work or any term or condition of work of any individual on account of his claiming benefits under this chapter, or in any manner obstruct or impede the claiming of benefits. Any employer or officer or agent of an employer who violates any provision of this subsection shall, for each offense, be guilty of a misdemeanor.

No individual claiming benefits shall be charged fees or costs of any kind in any proceeding under this chapter by the commission, the director, any of its or his employees or representatives, or by any court or any officer thereof, except that a court may assess costs if the court determines that the proceedings have been instituted or continued without reasonable ground. Any individual claiming benefits in any proceeding before the department, the commission, or a court may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent. Any person who violates any provision of this subsection shall, for each such offense, be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under this chapter shall be void; and such rights to benefits shall be exempt from levy, execution, attachment, or an order for the payment of attorney’s fees. Benefits received by any individual, so long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient, shall be exempt from any remedy whatsoever for the collection of debts. Any waiver of any exemption provided for in this subsection shall be void.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any action taken pursuant to section 72-1365(2), Idaho Code.

§ 72-1376. Representation in court.

In any civil action to enforce the provisions of this chapter the director, the commission, and the state shall be represented by the attorney general, or if the action is brought in the courts of any other state, by any attorneys qualified to appear in the courts of that state.

All criminal actions for violation of any provision of this chapter, or of any rules issued pursuant thereto, shall be prosecuted by the attorney general of the state, or, at his request and under his direction, by the prosecuting attorney of any county wherein the defendant resides or has a place of business.

§ 72-1377. Saving clause.

The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter at any time; and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this chapter at any time.

§ 72-1378. Separability of provisions.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, shall be declared by the courts to be unconstitutional, inoperative or void, the remainder of this chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

§ 72-1379. References in chapter.

A reference in this chapter to any state or federal law means the law as it existed on the effective date of this chapter and any amendments or recodifications thereto.

§ 72-1380. Federal reimbursement for benefits paid to newly covered workers during transition period. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1381. Director to cooperate with governor in mediation of disputes.

Upon the request of any interested party to an actual or potential labor dispute, the director shall have the power to mediate the dispute. The director or any interested party may apply to the governor for appointment of a mediator or a mediation panel of not less than three (3) citizens who are objective in matters involving labor disputes, and the governor shall, if the public interest will be served thereby, appoint such a mediator or mediation panel. Such mediator or mediation panel shall be paid actual expenses by the interested parties while engaged in such public business. Neither the director, the governor, nor any mediator or member of any mediation panel shall be authorized to arbitrate any labor dispute.

§ 72-1382. Duties of director — Determination of representatives.

The director shall, when a question arises concerning the representation of employees in a collective bargaining unit, investigate such controversy and certify to the parties the name or names of the representatives who have been selected. In any such investigation the director shall provide for an appropriate hearing, and may take a secret ballot of employees to ascertain such representatives. In all cases where a secret ballot is taken, the ballot shall permit a vote against representation by anyone named on the ballot; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the director to conduct an election on any matter which is within the exclusive jurisdiction of any federal official or board; and provided further that no election shall be directed in any bargaining unit or subdivision within which, in the preceding twelve (12) month period, a valid election was held.

§ 72-1383. Employers and bargaining agent are required to negotiate. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1384. Penalties for violations. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1385. Provisions not to apply to agricultural or domestic labor.

The provisions of sections 72-1381 and 72-1382, Idaho Code, shall not apply to labor engaged in agricultural labor as that term is defined in section 72-1304, Idaho Code, nor to anyone engaged in domestic service in homes.